Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6143.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32509a. As used in section 32509b: (a) "Boathouse" means a structure designed to provide shelter and protection from the elements and for docking, wharfage, accessing vessels and storing items for water related uses. (b) "Les Cheneaux Islands" means the archipelago of 36 islands, as well as the Lake Huron shoreline of the Upper Peninsula of this state, partially or entirely contained within the area that begins at the southerly extremity of the point of land on the easterly side of Dudley Bay; running thence southwesterly in a straight line to the southeasterly extremity of Beaver Tail Point; running thence westerly in a straight line to the southeasterly point of Crow Island; running thence southwesterly in a straight line to the extreme southeasterly point of Boot Island; running thence southwesterly in a straight line to Point Fuyards; and running thence northwesterly in a straight line to the extreme southerly part of St. Martin's Point. (c) "Traditional timber crib dock" means a dock or dock foundation constructed primarily of natural wood and natural stone, designed to allow water flow through the structure, and placed on submerged lands for riparian access, docking, wharfage, and mooring, including for repair, replacement, maintenance, or reconstruction. Sec. 32509b. (1) The department shall approve an application for a permit submitted in accordance with this part and part 13 for a traditional timber crib dock or boathouse, or both, within the Les Cheneaux Islands if the following conditions are met: (a) The traditional timber crib dock or boathouse is approved by the local unit of government that has zoning or planning jurisdiction over the area in which the traditional timber crib dock or boathouse will be installed. (b) Once installed, the traditional timber crib dock or boathouse, or both, will not extend beyond the applicant's riparian frontage or create a demonstrable navigational hazard. (c) The traditional timber crib dock or boathouse is constructed of natural wood and natural stone and is designed as a permeable structure. (2) If the conditions under subsection (1) are not met, the department may deny the permit and provide the applicant a written notice that clearly states that the traditional timber crib dock or boathouse, or both, would cause substantial adverse environmental impacts to the public trust bottomlands. The department shall include site-specific evidence of the impacts described in the written notice provided under this subsection. (3) The department shall not deny or condition a permit granted under this section for any of the following reasons without site-specific evidence of substantial environmental impacts: (a) Another lawful docking system may have a smaller physical footprint. (b) A generalized assumption regarding sediment transport, littoral drift, or shoreline processes. (c) A generalized assumption regarding the adverse effects to the environment or the public trust based on the size of the physical footprint of the traditional timber crib dock or boathouse, or both. (d) A generalized assumption regarding the adverse effects to the aquatic ecosystem. Enacting section 1. (1) This amendatory act does not take effect unless approved by a majority of the electors of Clark Township voting on the question. The question of the approval of this amendatory act shall be submitted to the qualified electors of Clark Township at the next regular election to be held not less than 60 days after the effective date of this amendatory act or at a special election called for that purpose. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form: "Shall "A bill to amend 1994 PA 451, entitled the "Natural resources and environmental protection act," (MCL 324.101 to 324.90106) by adding sections 32509a and 32509b; and to provide for a referendum," be adopted? Yes ( ) No ( )". (2) If a majority of the electors voting on the question, as determined by the canvass of votes cast, vote in favor of the adoption of this amendatory act, the amendatory act takes effect 10 days following the certification of the election results.